ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 구성품 > 헤드폰/헤드셋 > 헤드셋: 항공용 헤드셋; 게이밍 헤드셋; 청력 보호 헤드셋; 사무실 및 콜센터 헤드셋
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiokomponentit > Kuulokkeet ja kuulokemikrofonit > Kuulokemikrofonit: Lentokuulokemikrofoni; Pelikuulokemikrofoni; Kuulonsuojauskuulokemikrofoni; Toimisto- ja puhelinkeskuskuulokemikrofoni
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频组件 > 耳机/耳麦 > 耳麦: 航空耳机; 游戏耳机; 听力保护耳机; 办公和呼叫中心耳机
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso komponentai > Ausinės ir ausinės su mikrofonais > Ausinės su mikrofonais: Aviacijos ausinės su mikrofonu; Žaidimų ausines su mikrofonu; Klausos apsaugos ausines; Biuro ir skambučių centro ausinės
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Audio komponenty > Slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy > Náhlavné súpravy: Letecké headsety; Herné headsety; Headsety na ochranu sluchu; Kancelárske a call centrum headsety
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Компоненты аудиосистем > Наушники и гарнитуры > Гарнитуры: Авиационные гарнитуры; Игровые гарнитуры; Наушники с защитой от шума; Офисные гарнитуры и гарнитуры для колл-центров
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Hodetelefoner og headset > Headset: Luftfartsheadset; Spillheadset; Hørselsbeskyttende headset; Headset til kontor og kundesenter
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Componentes para equipamentos de áudio > Fones de ouvido e headsets > Headsets: Headsets para aviação; Headsets para jogos; Headsets de proteção auditiva; Headsets para escritório e call center
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Components > Headphones & Headsets > Headsets: Aviation Headsets; Gaming Headsets; Hearing Protection Headsets; Office & Call Center Headsets
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Composants audio > Casques et micro-casques > Micro-casques: Micro-casques d’aviation; Micro-casques de jeu; Micro-casques antibruit de protection; Micro-casques de bureau et centres d’appels
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Componentes áudio > Auscultadores e auriculares > Auriculares: Headsets para aviação; Headsets para jogos; Headsets de proteção auditiva; Headsets para escritório e call center
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > ส่วนประกอบทางเสียง > หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง > ชุดหูฟัง: ชุดหูฟังสำหรับการบิน; หูฟังเกมมิ่ง; หูฟังป้องกันเสียงดัง; หูฟังสำหรับสำนักงานและคอลเซ็นเตอร์
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Συστατικά ήχου > Ακουστικά (Headphones & Headsets) > Ακουστικά (Headsets): Ακουστικά αεροπορίας; Ακουστικά gaming; Ακουστικά προστασίας ακοής; Ακουστικά γραφείου & τηλεφωνικού κέντρου
es: Electrónica > Audio > Equipo de sonido > Auriculares y auriculares con micrófono > Auriculares con micrófono: Auriculares de aviación; Auriculares para juegos; Auriculares de protección auditiva; Auriculares de oficina y centro de llamadas
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Bộ phận thiết bị âm thanh > Tai nghe và tai nghe có micro > Tai nghe có micro: Tai nghe hàng không; Tai nghe gaming; Tai nghe bảo vệ thính lực; Tai nghe văn phòng và trung tâm gọi
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvukové komponenty > Sluchátka a náhlavní soupravy > Náhlavní sady: Letecké headsety; Herní headsety; Headsety s ochranou sluchu; Kancelářské headsety a headsety pro call centra
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Elementy audio > Słuchawki i zestawy słuchawkowe > Zestawy słuchawkowe: Zestawy słuchawkowe lotnicze; Zestawy słuchawkowe do gier; Zestawy słuchawkowe do ochrony słuchu; Zestawy słuchawkowe biurowe i call center
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオ機器 > イヤホン・ヘッドセット > ヘッドセット: 航空用ヘッドセット; ゲーミングヘッドセット; 聴覚保護ヘッドセット; オフィス・コールセンター用ヘッドセット
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Bileşenleri > Kulaklıklar ve Kafa Üstü Kulaklıklar > Mikrofonlu Kulaklıklar: Havacılık Kulaklıkları; Oyuncu Kulaklıkları; İşitme Korumalı Kulaklıklar; Ofis ve Çağrı Merkezi Kulaklıkları
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Componente audio > Căști audio și căști audio cu microfon > Căști audio cu microfon: Căști pentru aviație; Căști pentru gaming; Căști de protecție auditivă; Căști pentru birou și centre de apeluri
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiokomponenten > Kopfhörer & Headsets > Headsets: Luftfahrt-Headsets; Gaming-Headsets; Gehörschutz-Headsets; Büro- und Callcenter-Headsets
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиокомпоненти > Слушалки с микрофони > Слушалки с микрофон: Авиационни слушалки; Геймърски слушалки; Слушалки за защита на слуха; Слушалки за офис и център за обаждания
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio dijelovi > Slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom > Slušalice s mikrofonom: Avionske slušalice; Gaming slušalice; Zaštitne slušalice; Uredske slušalice
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudkomponenter > Hörlurar och headsets > Headsets: Flygheadset; Gamingheadset; Hörselskyddsheadset; Kontors- och callcenterheadset
it: Elettronica > Audio > Componenti audio > Cuffie e auricolari > Cuffie con microfono: Cuffie per l'aviazione; Cuffie da gioco; Cuffie di protezione dell'udito; Cuffie da ufficio e call center
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio komponente > Slušalke in slušalke z mikrofonom > Slušalke z mikrofonom: Letalske slušalke; Igralne slušalke; Slušalke za zaščito sluha; Pisarniške slušalke in slušalke za klicne centre
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音訊元件 > 耳機與頭戴式耳機 > 頭戴式耳機: 航空耳麥; 遊戲耳麥; 聽力保護耳麥; 辦公室及客服中心耳麥
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audiocomponenten > Hoofdtelefoons en headsets > Headsets: Luchtvaart headsets; Gaming headsets; Gehoorbescherming headsets; Kantoor en callcenter headsets
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lydkomponenter > Hovedtelefoner og headset > Headsets: Luftfart – headsets; Gaming-headsets; Hørebeskyttelse – headsets; Kontor og callcenter – headsets
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkomponensek > Fejhallgatók és fülhallgatók > Fülhallgatók: Repülési headsetek; Gamer headsetek; Hallásvédő headsetek; Irodai és call centeres headsetek